dict-sa_sample/sa_IN.dic
अकाङ्क्षत/5
अक्षथ/8
अख्यत/5
अगदत/2,5
अगदिष्यत/2,3
अघ्रासिष्ट/2,3
अघ्रास्यत/3,5
अङ्क्/223
अचेतत/2
अचेतिष्ट/3
अचेतिष्यत/2,5
अजिघ्रत/2,3,5
अटत/3,109
अटथ/8
अटाव/8
अट्/213,226,336
अट्यास्त/3
अड्/225
अतत/2,5,8,56,109
अतप्स्यत/2,5
अताप्त/2,3
अताम/56
अताव/8
अतिष्यथ/8
अतेत/2
अत्/145,206,208,209,213,217,223,266,330
अत्यास्त/2
अदात/2,3
अदास्यत/2,3,5
अदुग्ध/3
अधुक्षन्/44
अधोक्/275
अधोक्ष्यत/2,3,5
अनदत/2,3,5
अनमत/2,5
अनयत/2,5
अनयन्/44
अनेष्यत/5
अनेष्यन्/44
अनंस्यत/2,3,5
अपात/3,5
अपाव/3
अपास्यत/2,3
अपिबत/2,3,5
अभवत/2,3
अयिता/183,187,191
अयिषीय/181
अयेत/2,153
अर्क/320
अर्चथ/8
अर्चिष्यथ/8
असि/199
अस्त/56
आटत/3,154
आतत/2,3
आताम/5
आतिष्यत/2,3,5
आनर्च/154
आर्चत/3,5
आर्चिष्ट/3
आस्/218
ईर्/51
उत्तमपुरुष/8
उध्रस्/312
एधि/139
एधिता/70,71,187,190,191,222
एधेत/2,153
एधेय/255
ऐधिष्ये/16
कट्/226,336
कड्/225
कण्/225,226
कम्पिता/70,71,183,187,222
काङ्क्षितास्थ/27,28
काङ्क्षिष्यथ/13
क्रष्टा/235
क्षापय/145
क्ष्णु/461
गदितासि/53
दत्थ/257
दत्से/66
ददसे/66
ददावहे/483
ददिषीय/116
दातासि/47,48
दोग्धासि/47,48
दोहै/369
धुक्षे/66
नदिष्यथ/12
नमेम/39
नयसे/66
नेतासि/46
श्रु/479
